Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Cities of Second to Sixth Class, Counties and Regions

173.110.
Free public libraries in cities of second class; board of trustees. [Repealed.]

173.120.
Powers of board of trustees. [Repealed.]

173.130.
Conduct of public library; disposition of fines and costs. [Repealed.]

173.140.
Tax for public library; limit on incurring of liabilities. [Repealed.]

173.150.
Tax for libraries established upon accumulation of funds under laws enacted prior to 1900. [Repealed.]

173.160.
Public libraries in cities of third, fourth, fifth and sixth classes; establishment; board of trustees. [Repealed.]

173.170.
Powers of board of trustees. [Repealed.]

173.180.
Conduct of the library; rules as to use and preservation of library property. [Repealed.]

173.190.
Tax to establish public library. [Repealed.]

173.200.
Popular subscription to establish library. [Repealed.]

173.210.
Tax for maintenance of public library. [Repealed.]

173.220.
Library to receive one-half of fines collected in police court; donations; limit on incurring of liabilities. [Repealed.]

173.230.
Application of sections. [Repealed.]

173.240.
Other public libraries entitled to benefits of KRS 173.160 to 173.290. [Repealed.]

173.250.
Division of fines and revenue between races. [Repealed.]

173.260.
When library for one race to receive all fines; race not using library not to be taxed. [Repealed.]

173.270.
Library board; appointment; terms. [Repealed.]

173.280.
Warrant to specify fund out of which to be paid. [Repealed.]

173.290.
Petition to make library a free library; appeal. [Repealed.]